Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2226.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 13, chapter 38, article 7, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-3904, to read: START_STATUTE13-3904. Veteran status; procedure A. At a person's initial appearance hearing, the court shall inquire of the person's status as a veteran of the United States armed forces. tHE PERSON'S RESPONSE REGARDING THE PERSON'S VETERAN STATUS MAY NOT BE USED AGAINST THEM IN CRIMINAL PROCEEDINGS UNLESS THE PERSON FALSELY ATTESTS THAT THEY ARE A VETERAN OF THE uNITED sTATES ARMED FORCES. B. If the court determines that a person is a veteran of the United States armed forces, the court shall notify the prosecuting agency of the person's veteran status. C. On notification from the court, unless the person is charged with a dangerous offense under section 13-704, a serious offense or violent or aggravated felony as defined in section 13-706 or a dangerous crime against children as defined in section 13-705, the court shall provide information to the person regarding services that are provided by the department of veterans' services and the prosecuting agency shall consider referring the person to the veterans court or another appropriate treatment court or diversion program. D. If a person's status as a veteran of the United States armed forces is in question, the prosecuting agency shall give the person or the person's attorney an opportunity to prove the person's veteran status through official documentation, including a United States department of defense form 214 (DD-214) indicating the person's release or discharge from active military duty. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.